Delaware, session 153, SB101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 47, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4701. Definitions. (34) âPatient-practitioner relationshipâ means, with respect to prescribing drugs for a patient, that the practitioner is a licensed practitioner who: Â who meets one or more of the following: Â a. Has conducted at least 1 in-person medical evaluation of the patient and performed a medical history and physical examination sufficient to establish a diagnosis and to identify underlying conditions of, or contraindications to, the treatment recommended or provided; or Â provided. b. Personally knows the patient and the patientâs general health status through an existing patient-practitioner relationship; or Â relationship. c. Provides treatment in consultation with or upon referral of another practitioner who has an existing patient-practitioner relationship with the patient and who has agreed to supervise the patientâs treatment, including follow-up care and use of the prescribed medications; or Â medications. d. Provides treatment to the patient through an on-call or cross-coverage situation for another practitioner who has an existing patient-practitioner relationship with the patient; or Â patient. e. Provides continuing medications on a short-term basis for a new patient prior to the first appointment; or Â appointment. f. Provides treatment based upon admission orders for a newly hospitalized patient. g. Provides treatment for opioid use disorder under a properly established provider-patient relationship as provided by Â§ 6003 of Title 24 for Schedule III through V medications approved by the Federal Drug Administration for such treatment.